Utah statutes.
76-6-1002.   Damage to mail receptacle -- Penalties -- Greater offenses.

(1)  A person commits the crime of damage to a mail receptacle if the person knowingly damages the condition of a mail receptacle, including:

(a)  taking, concealing, damaging, or destroying a key; or

(b)  breaking open, tearing down, taking, damaging, or destroying a mail receptacle.

(2) (a)  In determining the degree of an offense committed under Subsection (1), the penalty levels in Subsection 76-6-106(3)(b) apply.

(b)  If the act committed amounts to an offense subject to a greater penalty, this subsection does not prohibit prosecution and sentencing for the more serious offense.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2002 General Session

